Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2619.02
Visitor's evaluation; how conducted.

The guardianship evaluation by the visitor shall be conducted with minimum interference with the allegedly incapacitated person's activities. Any interviews and examinations shall take place in the usual residence unless the visitor deems it necessary to conduct the interview or examination elsewhere. In cases of such necessity, the interview or examination shall take place during normal business hours.

Laws 1982, LB 428, § 3.